Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Chapter 23. Virginia Electric Utility Regulation Act.
§ 56-594.02.
Solar-powered or wind-powered electricity generation; power purchase agreements; pilot programs.

The Commission shall conduct pilot programs under which a person that owns or operates a solar-powered or wind-powered electricity generation facility located on premises owned or leased by an eligible customer-generator, as defined in § 56-594, shall
be permitted to sell the electricity generated from such facility exclusively to such eligible customer-generator under a power purchase agreement used to provide third party financing of the costs of such a renewable generation
facility (third party power purchase agreement), subject to the following terms, conditions, and restrictions:

Notwithstanding subsection G of § 56-580 or any other provision of law, a pilot program shall be conducted within the certificated service territory of each investor-owned electric utility (“Pilot Utility”);

Except as provided in this subdivision, both jurisdictional and nonjurisdictional customers may participate in such pilot programs on a first-come, first-serve basis. The aggregated capacity of all generation facilities that are subject to such third
party power purchase agreements at any time during the pilot program shall not exceed 500 megawatts for Virginia jurisdictional customers and 500 megawatts for Virginia nonjurisdictional customers. Such limitation on the
aggregated capacity of such facilities shall constitute a portion of the existing limit of six percent of each Pilot Utility’s adjusted Virginia peak-load forecast for the previous year that is available to eligible customer-generators
pursuant to subsection E of § 56-594. Notwithstanding any provision of this section that incorporates provisions of § 56-594, the seller and the customer shall elect either to (i) enter into their third party power purchase
agreement subject to the conditions and provisions of the Pilot Utility’s net energy metering program under § 56-594 or (ii) provide that electricity generated from the generation facilities subject to the third party power
purchase agreement will not be net metered under § 56-594, provided that an election not to net meter under § 56-594 shall not exempt the third party power purchase agreement and the parties thereto from the requirements
of this section that incorporate provisions of § 56-594;

A solar-powered or wind-powered generation facility with a capacity of no less than 50 kilowatts and no more than three megawatts shall be eligible for a third party power purchase agreement under a pilot program; however, if the customer under such agreement
is a low-income utility customer, as defined in § 56-576, or is an entity with tax-exempt status in accordance with § 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, then such facility is eligible for the pilot
program even if it does not meet the 50 kilowatts minimum size requirement. The maximum generation capacity of three megawatts shall not affect the limits on the capacity of electrical generating capacities of 25 kilowatts
for residential customers and three megawatts for nonresidential customers set forth in subsection B of § 56-594, which limitations shall continue to apply to net energy metering generation facilities regardless of whether
they are the subject of a third party power purchase agreement under the pilot program;

A generation facility that is the subject of a third party power purchase agreement under the pilot program shall serve only one customer, and a third party power purchase agreement shall not serve multiple customers;

The customer under a third party power purchase agreement under the pilot program shall be subject to the interconnection and other requirements imposed on eligible customer-generators pursuant to subsection C of § 56-594, including the requirement that
the customer bear the reasonable costs, as determined by the Commission, of the items described in clauses (i), (ii), and (iii) of such subsection;

A third party power purchase agreement under the pilot program shall not be valid unless it conforms in all respects to the requirements of the pilot program conducted under the provisions of this section and unless the Commission and the Pilot Utility
are provided written notice of the parties’ intent to enter into a third party power purchase agreement not less than 30 days prior to the agreement’s proposed effective date; and

An affiliate of the Pilot Utility shall be permitted to offer and enter into third party power purchase arrangements on the same basis as may any other person that satisfies the requirements of being a seller under a third party power purchase agreement
under the pilot program.

The Commission shall review the pilot program established pursuant to subsection A in 2015 and every two years thereafter during the pilot program. In its review, the Commission shall determine whether the limitations in subdivisions A 2 and 3 should
be expanded, reduced, or continued.

Any third party power purchase agreement that is not entered into pursuant to the pilot program established pursuant to subsection A is prohibited in the Pilot Utility’s service territory, unless such third party power purchase agreement is entered into
between a licensed supplier and a retail customer pursuant to § 56-577 where such supplier is responsible for serving 100 percent of the load requirements for each retail customer account it serves.

If the Commission approves a tariff proposed for electric power provided 100 percent from renewable energy that serves 100 percent of the load requirements for each retail customer account it serves under such tariff, hereafter referred to as a “green
tariff,” such a green tariff shall not be available to any party to a third party power purchase agreement for the account being served by such power purchase agreement, and such an agreement shall remain in effect notwithstanding
the approval of the green tariff.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as (i) rendering any person, by virtue of its selling electric power to an eligible customer-generator under a third party power purchase agreement entered into pursuant to the pilot program established under
this section, a public utility or a competitive service provider, (ii) imposing a requirement that such a person meet 100 percent of the load requirements for each retail customer account it serves, or (iii) affecting third party
power purchase agreements in effect prior to July 1, 2013.

Nothing in this section shall abridge any rights of either party to an agreement between a Pilot Utility and a group purchasing organization acting on behalf of Virginia local governments regarding the purchase of electric service.

The Commission shall, by December 1, 2013, establish guidelines concerning (i) information to be provided in notices required under subdivision A 6 and (ii) procedures for aggregating and posting to the Commission’s web site information derived from the
aforesaid notices, including total capacity utilized by pilot projects for which notice has been received and capacity remaining available for future pilot projects. In addition, the Commission may adopt such rules or establish
such guidelines as may be necessary for its general administration of the pilot program established under this section.

History.
2013, cc. 358, 382; 2017, c. 803; 2020, cc. 1187, 1188, 1189, 1193, 1194, 1239; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 361, 362.

Subdivision A 2 set out twice.

The first version of subdivision A 2 above is effective until July 1, 2022. The second version of subdivision A 2 is effective July 1, 2022.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, cc. 358 and 382, cls.

1-3

, as amended by Acts 2017, c. 803, and Acts 2020, cc. 1187, 1188, 1189, 1193, 1194, and 1239, were codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 2017, c. 803, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act relating to a pilot program conducted within the certificated service territory of an investor-owned utility that was not bound by a rate case settlement adopted by the State Corporation
Commission that extended in its application beyond January 1, 2002, shall expire on July 1, 2022. Such expiration shall not affect any power purchase agreement entered into by such a utility during the term of its pilot program.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1187, 1188, 1189 and 1239 are identical, and rewrote subdivision A 1, which read: “A pilot program shall be conducted within the certificated service territory of each investor-owned electric utility other than a utility described
in subsection G of § 56-580 of the Code of Virginia (‘Pilot Utility’), provided that within the certificated service territory of an investor-owned utility that was not bound by a rate case settlement adopted by the Commission that
extended in its application beyond January 1, 2002, nonprofit, private institutions of higher education as defined in §

23.1-100

of the Code of Virginia that are not being served by generation provided under subdivision A 5 of § 56-577 of the Code of Virginia shall be deemed to be customer-generators eligible to participate in the pilot program”;
in subdivision A 2, substituted “500 megawatts for Virginia jurisdictional customers and 500 megawatts for Virginia nonjurisdictional customers” for “50 megawatts,” “40 megawatts” for “seven megawatts” and “six percent” for “one percent”;
in subdivision A 3, twice substituted “three megawatts” for “one megawatt” and once for “500 kilowatts,” and substituted “25 kilowatts” for “20 kilowatts.”

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1193 and 1194 are identical, and in addition to the changes made by cc. 1187, 1188, 1189, inserted “a low-income utility customer, as defined in § 56-576 of the Code of Virginia, or is” in subdivision A 3.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 361 and 362, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and added the first sentence in subdivision A 2.

§ 56-594.1.
Interconnection by farms.

As used in this section, “eligible farm” means an entity that owns or operates facilities within the Commonwealth for the generation of electric energy, which entity is described in subdivision (b)(10) of § 56-265.1.

Eligible farms shall be permitted to connect to the electrical grid in order to feed into the grid electricity generated by the eligible farm from its facilities that generate electricity from a waste-to-energy technology.

The Commission shall adopt regulations to implement this section pursuant to § 56-578.

History.
2009, c. 746.

§ 56-594.2.
Small agricultural generators.

As used in this section:“Small agricultural generating facility” means an electrical generating facility that:

Has a capacity:

Of not more than 1.5 megawatts; and

That does not exceed 150 percent of the customer’s expected annual energy consumption based on the previous 12 months of billing history or an annualized calculation of billing history if 12 months of billing history is not available;

Is not an eligible agricultural customer-generator pursuant to § 56-594;

Operates a small agricultural generating facility as part of (i) an agricultural business or (ii) any business granted a manufacturer license pursuant to subdivisions 1 through 6 of §

4.1-206.1

;

May be served by multiple meters that are located at separate but contiguous sites;

May aggregate the electricity consumption measured by the meters, solely for purposes of calculating 150 percent of the customer’s expected annual energy consumption, but not for billing or retail service purposes, provided that the same utility serves
all of its meters;

Uses not more than 25 percent of contiguous land owned or controlled by the agricultural business for purposes of the renewable energy generating facility; and

Issues a certification under oath as to the amount of land being used for renewable generation.“Utility” includes supplier or distributor, as applicable.

A small agricultural generator electing to interconnect pursuant to this section shall:

Enter into a power purchase agreement with its utility to sell all of the electricity generated from its small agricultural generating facility, which power purchase agreement obligates the utility to purchase all the electricity generated, at a rate
agreed upon by the parties, but at a rate not less than the utility’s Commission-approved avoided cost tariff for energy and capacity;

Have the rights described in subsection E of § 56-594 pertaining to an eligible agricultural customer-generator as to the renewable energy certificates or other environmental attributes generated by the renewable energy generating facility;

Abide by the appropriate small generator interconnection process as described in 20VAC5-314; and

Pay to its utility any necessary additional expenses as required by this section.

Utilities:

Shall purchase, through the power purchase agreement described in subdivision B 1, all of the output of the small agricultural generator;

Shall recover the cost for its distribution facilities to the generating meter either through a proportional cost-sharing agreement with the small agricultural generator or through metering the total capacity and energy placed on the distribution system
by the small agricultural generator;

Shall recover all costs incurred by the utility to purchase electricity, capacity, and renewable energy certificates from the small agricultural generator:

If the utility has a Commission-approved Renewable Energy Portfolio Standard (RPS) plan and rate adjustment clause, through the utility’s RPS rate adjustment clause; or

If the utility does not have a Commission-approved RPS rate adjustment clause, through the utility’s fuel adjustment clause or through the utility’s cost of purchased power;

2.
Uses as its total source of fuel renewable energy;

3.
Is located on the customer’s premises and is interconnected with its utility through a separate meter;

4.
Is interconnected and operated in parallel with an electric utility’s distribution but not transmission facilities;

5.
Is designed so that the electricity generated by the facility is expected to remain on the utility’s distribution system; and

6.
Is a qualifying small power production facility pursuant to the Public Utility Regulatory Policies Act of 1978 (P.L. 95-617). “Small agricultural generator” means a customer that:

4.
May conduct settlement transactions for purchased power in dollars on the small agricultural generator’s electric bill or through other means of settlement, in the utility’s sole discretion;

5.
Shall bill the small agricultural generator eligible costs for small generator interconnection studies required pursuant to the appropriate small generator interconnection process described in subdivision B 3; and

6.
Shall bill its expenses, at cost, for any additional engineering studies that a small agricultural generator is required to pay prior to interconnection.

History.
2017, cc. 565, 581; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 266.

Cross references.

As to local regulation of solar facilities, see §

15.2-2288.7

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, cc. 565 and 581, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Corporation Commission shall conduct a single docketed proceeding to implement the provisions of this act. The proceeding shall be initiated between August 1, 2017, and December 1, 2017. The
proceeding shall provide notice to the public and an opportunity for public comment. A final order amending or adopting regulations under §§ 56-578, 56-594, as amended by this act, and 56-594.1 of the Code of Virginia that the Commission
deems necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act shall be issued not later than June 1, 2018. Utilities shall be required to each make a compliance filing, containing a schedule to accommodate small agricultural generators,
to the Commission for administrative approval not sooner than three months following the issuance of the Commission’s order amending or adopting regulations under this enactment. Utilities shall not be required to undergo rate proceedings
or individual proceedings of any kind to implement the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 266, cl. 2 provides: “That after August 1, 2021, but before January 1, 2022, the State Corporation Commission (the Commission) shall initiate a rulemaking proceeding to promulgate any changes to its regulations necessary to
implement the provisions of this act. The Commission shall complete such rulemaking proceeding within 12 months of its initiation. In conducting such a proceeding, the Commission may require that notice be provided to current small
agricultural generators, if any, and may publish a notice in the Virginia Register of Regulations, but no other public notice is required. An opportunity to request a hearing shall be afforded, but if no request is made, a hearing
shall not be required. In the rulemaking proceeding, the electric utilities affected by this act shall be required to submit compliance filings, but no other individual proceedings shall be required or conducted.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 266, effective July 1, 2021, added clause (ii) and made related changes in subdivision 2 in the definition of “Small agricultural generator.”

§ 56-594.3.
Shared solar programs.

As used in this section:“Applicable bill credit rate” means the dollar-per-kilowatt-hour rate used to calculate the subscriber’s bill credit.“Bill credit” means the monetary value of the electricity, in kilowatt-hours, generated by the shared solar facility
allocated to a subscriber to offset that subscriber’s electricity bill.“Low-income customer” means any person or household whose income is no more than 80 percent of the median income of the locality in which the customer resides.
The median income of the locality is determined by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development.“Low-income service organization” means a nonresidential customer of an investor-owned utility whose primary purpose is to
serve low-income individuals and households.“Low-income shared solar facility” means a shared solar facility at least 30 percent of the capacity of which is subscribed by low-income customers or low-income service organizations.“Minimum
bill” means an amount determined by the Commission under subsection D that subscribers are required to, at a minimum, pay on their utility bill each month after accounting for any bill credits.“Phase II Utility” has the same meaning
as provided in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1.“Shared solar facility” means a facility that:

Generates electricity by means of a solar photovoltaic device with a nameplate capacity rating that does not exceed 5,000 kilowatts of alternating current;

Is located in the service territory of an investor-owned electric utility;

Is connected to the electric distribution grid serving the Commonwealth;

Has at least three subscribers;

Has at least 40 percent of its capacity subscribed by customers with subscriptions of 25 kilowatts or less; and

Is located on a single parcel of land.“Shared solar program” or “program” means the program created through the adoption of rules to allow for the development of shared solar facilities.“Subscriber” means a retail customer of a utility that (i) owns one
or more subscriptions of a shared solar facility that is interconnected with the utility and (ii) receives service in the service territory of the same utility in whose service territory the shared solar facility is located.“Subscriber
organization” means any for-profit or nonprofit entity that owns or operates one or more shared solar facilities. A subscriber organization shall not be considered a utility solely as a result of its ownership or operation
of a shared solar facility.“Subscription” means a contract or other agreement between a subscriber and the owner of a shared solar facility. A subscription shall be sized such that the estimated bill credits do not exceed
the subscriber’s average annual bill for the customer account to which the subscription is attributed.“Utility” means a Phase II Utility.

The Commission shall establish by regulation a program that affords customers of a Phase II Utility the opportunity to participate in shared solar projects. Under its shared solar program, a utility shall provide a bill credit for the proportional output
of a shared solar facility attributable to that subscriber. The shared solar program shall be administered as follows:

The value of the bill credit for the subscriber shall be calculated by multiplying the subscriber’s portion of the kilowatt-hour electricity production from the shared solar facility by the applicable bill credit rate for the subscriber. Any amount of
the bill credit that exceeds the subscriber’s monthly bill, minus the minimum bill, shall be carried over and applied to the next month’s bill.

The utility shall provide bill credits to a shared solar facility’s subscribers for not less than 25 years from the date the shared solar facility becomes commercially operational.

The subscriber organization shall, on a monthly basis, in a standardized electronic format, and pursuant to guidelines established by the Commission, provide to the utility a subscriber list indicating the kilowatt-hours of generation attributable to
each of the subscribers participating in a shared solar facility in accordance with the subscriber’s portion of the output of the shared solar facility.

Subscriber lists may be updated monthly to reflect canceling subscribers and to add new subscribers. The utility shall apply bill credits to subscriber bills within two billing cycles following the cycle during which the energy was generated by the shared
solar facility.

Each utility shall, on a monthly basis and in a standardized electronic format, provide to the subscriber organization a report indicating the total value of bill credits generated by the shared solar facility in the prior month, as well as the amount
of the bill credit applied to each subscriber.

A subscriber organization may accumulate bill credits in the event that all of the electricity generated by a shared solar facility is not allocated to subscribers in a given month. On an annual basis and pursuant to guidelines established by the Commission,
the subscriber organization shall furnish to the utility allocation instructions for distributing excess bill credits to subscribers.

All environmental attributes associated with a shared solar facility, including renewable energy certificates, shall be considered property of the subscriber organization. At the subscriber organization’s discretion, such environmental attributes may
be distributed to the subscribers, sold to load-serving entities with compliance obligations or other buyers, accumulated, or retired.

Each subscriber shall pay a minimum bill, established pursuant to subsection D, and shall receive an applicable bill credit based on the subscriber’s customer class of residential, commercial, or industrial. Each class’s applicable credit rate shall be
calculated by the Commission annually by dividing revenues to the class by sales, measured in kilowatt-hours, to that class to yield a bill credit rate for the class ($/kWh).

The Commission shall establish a minimum bill, which shall include the costs of all utility infrastructure and services used to provide electric service and administrative costs of the shared solar program. The Commission may modify the minimum bill over
time. In establishing the minimum bill, the Commission shall (i) consider further costs the Commission deems relevant to ensure subscribing customers pay a fair share of the costs of providing electric services and (ii) minimize
the costs shifted to customers not in a shared solar program. Low-income customers shall be exempt from the minimum bill.

The Commission shall approve a shared solar facility program of 150 megawatts with a minimum requirement of 30 percent low-income customers. The Commission shall approve an additional 50 megawatts of capacity upon determining that at least 45 megawatts
of the aggregated shared solar capacity in the Commonwealth have been subscribed to by low-income customers. Subscriber organizations shall be allowed to demonstrate compliance with the low income requirement using either project
capacity or project savings methodology. The Commission, in collaboration with the Department of Energy, may adopt mechanisms to ensure low-income customer participation.

The Commission shall establish by regulation a shared solar program that complies with the provisions of subsections B, C, D, and E by January 1, 2021, and shall require each utility to file any tariffs, agreements, or forms necessary for implementation
of the program within 60 days of the utility’s full implementation of a new customer information platform or by July 1, 2023, whichever occurs first. Any rule or utility implementation filings approved by the Commission shall:

Reasonably allow for the creation of shared solar facilities;

Allow all customer classes to participate in the program;

Create a stakeholder working group including low-income community representatives and community solar providers to facilitate low-income customer and low-income service organization participation in the program;

Encourage public-private partnerships to further the Commonwealth’s clean energy and equity goals, such as state agency and affordable housing provider participation in the program as subscribers of shared solar projects;

Not remove a customer from its otherwise applicable customer class in order to participate in a shared solar facility;

Reasonably allow for the transferability and portability of subscriptions, including allowing a subscriber to retain a subscription to a shared solar facility if the subscriber moves within the same utility’s service territory;

Establish standards, fees, and processes for the interconnection of shared solar facilities that allow the utility to recover reasonable interconnection costs for each shared solar facility;

Adopt standardized consumer disclosure forms;

Allow the utility the opportunity to recover reasonable costs of administering the program;

Ensure nondiscriminatory and efficient requirements and utility procedures for interconnecting projects;

Address the co-location of two or more shared solar facilities on a single parcel of land and provide guidelines for determining when two or more facilities are co-located;

Include a program implementation schedule;

Prohibit credit checks as a means of establishing eligibility for residential customers to become subscribers;

Require net crediting functionality as part of any new customer information platform approved by the Commission. Under net crediting, the utility shall include the shared solar subscription fee on the customer’s utility bill and provide the customer with
a net credit equivalent to the total bill credit value for that generation period minus the shared solar subscription fee as set by the subscriber organization. The net crediting fee shall not exceed one percent of the
bill credit value. Net crediting shall be optional for subscriber organizations, and any shared solar subscription fees charged via the net crediting model shall be set to ensure that subscribers do not pay more in subscription
fees than they receive in bill credits; and

Allow the utility to recover as the cost of purchased power pursuant to § 56-249.6 any difference between the bill credit provided to the subscriber and the cost of energy injected into the grid by the subscriber organization.

Within 180 days of finalization of the Commission’s adoption of regulations for the shared solar program, a utility shall, provided that the utility has successfully implemented its customer information platform, begin crediting subscriber accounts of
each shared solar facility interconnected in its service territory, subject to the requirements of this section and regulations adopted thereto.

History.
2020, cc. 1238, 1264; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, effective October 1, 2021, substituted “Department of Energy” for “Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy” in subsection E.

§ 56-595.
Repealed by Acts 2003, c. 885, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Repealed § 56-595 was amended by Acts 2003, c. 904.

Acts 2003, c. 885, cl. 5, provides: “That the current members of the Legislative Transition Task Force appointed pursuant to § 56-595 of the Code of Virginia and members appointed to fill vacancies may continue to serve as members of the Commission on
Electric Utility Restructuring until July 1, 2008, if such members retain their legislative seats.”

Acts 2003, c. 885, cl. 6, provides: “That whenever any reference is made in law or other provision approved by the General Assembly to the former Legislative Transition Task Force, such reference shall be construed to apply mutatis mutandis to the Commission
on Electric Utility Restructuring.”

Former § 56-595, pertaining to establishment of Legislative Transition Task Force, derived from 1999, c. 411.

§ 56-596.
Consideration of economic development; report.

In all relevant proceedings pursuant to this Act, the Commission shall take into consideration, among other things, the goal of economic development in the Commonwealth.

By September 1 of each year, the Commission shall report to the Commission on Electric Utility Regulation and the Governor on the status of the implementation of this chapter and its recommendations regarding the implementation of the provisions of this
chapter. This report shall include the Commission’s recommendations for any actions by the General Assembly, the Commission, electric utilities, or any other entity that the Commission considers to be in the public interest.

History.
2001, c. 748; 2003, c. 885; 2008, c. 883.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 885 substituted “Commission on Electric Utility Restructuring” for “Legislative Transition Task Force” in subsection B.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 883 rewrote the section.

§ 56-596.1.
New generating facilities utilizing energy derived from sunlight and from wind; report.

It is the objective of the General Assembly that the construction and development of new utility-owned and utility-operated generating facilities utilizing energy derived from sunlight and from wind with an aggregate capacity of 5,000 megawatts, including
rooftop solar installations with a capacity of not less than 50 kilowatts, and with an aggregate capacity of 50 megawatts, be placed in service on or before July 1, 2028. It is also the objective of the General Assembly that 2,700
megawatts of aggregate energy storage capacity be placed into service on or before July 1, 2030. The Commission shall submit a report and make recommendations to the Governor and the General Assembly annually on or before December
1 of each year through December 1, 2028, assessing (i) the aggregate annual new construction and development of new utility-owned and utility-operated generating facilities utilizing energy derived from sunlight, (ii) the integration
of utility-owned renewable electric generation resources with the utility’s electric distribution grid, (iii) the aggregate additional utility-owned and utility-operated generating facilities utilizing energy derived from sunlight
placed in operation since July 1, 2018, (iv) the need for additional generation of electricity utilizing energy derived from sunlight in order to meet the objective of the General Assembly on or before July 1, 2028, and (v) the aggregate
annual new construction or purchase of energy storage facilities. The Commission shall submit copies of such annual reports to the Chairman of the House Committee on Labor and Commerce, the Chairman of the Senate Committee on Commerce
and Labor, and the Chairman of the Commission on Electric Utility Regulation.

History.
2018, c. 296; 2020, c. 1190.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 14 was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 20 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to any applications pending with the State Corporation Commission regarding new underground facilities or offshore wind facilities on or after January 1, 2018.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 24 provides: “That this act shall be known as the Grid Transformation and Security Act.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, twice substituted “The Commission” for “The State Corporation Commission.”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “the Chairman of the House Committee on Labor and Commerce, the Chairman of the Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor” for “the Chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Commerce and Labor.”
March 10, 2021.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1190 inserted the second sentence, added “and (v) the aggregate annual new construction or purchase of energy storage facilities” in the penultimate sentence at the end and made stylistic changes.